Utah statutes.
31A-26-311.   Rescission of contracts with public adjusters.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), an insured or claimant under an
insurance policy who contracts with a public adjuster to assist in the
settlement of a claim may rescind that contract by delivering written notice
of rescission to the public adjuster within ten days of entering into the
contract.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply if prior to the rescission the public
adjuster has effected an acceptable settlement of the claim.
